Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-309
Public schools; duty to visit and supervise.

The Commissioner of Education shall visit or cause to be visited such schools as he or she may have it in his or her power to do and witness and advise with teachers and school officers upon the manner in which they are conducted.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision VIII, § 3, p. 363;

R.S.1913, § 6900;

C.S.1922, § 6476;

C.S.1929, § 79-1603;

R.S.1943, § 79-1606;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 26, p. 701;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-305;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 137.